contrib/dict/hyph_de_DE.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.2ab1a
.a1b
.2a1bi4
.ab3l2
.abo2
.ab3ol
.2ab1or
.ac4k2
.ag4n
.a1g
.ag4r4
.a1g2u
.2ai2s
.2ak1t2a
.a4k1t
.al3b2r4
.a2l1b
.2a1l2e
.al5l4en
.a4l1l
.al1le
.al4tei
.a4l1t
.al1te
.al6t3s
.amp2e4
.a2m1p
.am4t4s3
.a4m1t
.a2n3d2
.ande2n6k
.an1de
.and4ri
.and2r4
.a4n1g2
.an3g1li
.ang1l
.an4g2s4
.angs1t3
.a6n3s
.an4si.
.an1si
.an1s2p4
.ans2t
.an4t2a1g
.a2n1t
.an1ta
.an3t1h
.a1p2o1
.a1p
.a2p1s2
.ar2i1e
.2a1ri
.ar1k2a
.a2r1k
.ar4m3ac
.a4r1m
.ar1ma
.ar2sc
.a4r1s
.ar4t3ei
.ar3t2e
.a4r1t
.as3t
.2as4ta
.at4h
.2a1t
.a2u3d
.a2u
.au2f3
.a2u4s3
.ausc4h3
.2au1sc
.a1x4
.äm3
.ä2t2s
.be3e2r1b
.b4ee
.be3r1a
.be3r2e
.berg3a
.be4r1g
.ber6g2a1b
.ber4g3r4
.bo1ge2
.b2o1g
.bo4s3k2
.bu4s1er
.b2us
.bu1se
.by4t2
.3by1
.c4h2
.2d1a1b4
.da2r1
.da4rin
.d2a1ri
.da4r1m1
.d4a4te.
.da1t4e2
.d2a1t
.d4a4tes
.de2al
.1de
.d2e1a
.d1e1i
.de4in.
.d2e1o2
.d2e3r4en
.de1re
.de1s1
.de1s2e
.de3s1k2
.des2t
.di2e1n4e
.1di
.di2e
.d2i1en
.do2mo
.d2om
.2do1p2e
.d2o2r1f1
.2d1ü1b
.dy2s1
.ebe2r1
.e1b
.ehe1i
.e1he
.ei3e2
.ei4n1a
.ei4n1e4n6g
.e2i1ne
.ei3nen
.ei2sp2
.ei4s3t
.ei4t2r4
.e2it
.eke2
.e1k
.el2bi
.e2l1b
.el4b3s
.2e2m3m2
.e1m
.en1
.en4d3er
.e2n1d
.en1de
.en5d4er.
.en2d3r4
.en2d3s
.e4n1n2
.en6n1s3
.e4n2t3
.en4tei
.en1te
.en4t2r4
.er8bre2c4h1t
.er3b2r4
.e2r1b
.erb1re
.erbr2ec4h
.er3da
.e2r1d
.er4dan
.er4dar
.er4d1ei
.er3de
.er4der
.e1r1e
.ere3c
.e2r1f4
.2e1r1i
.er8s2t1ein
.e4r1s
.ers1t
.ers1t2e
.ers2te2i
.er8stritt.
.er3s4t2r4
.ers3t1ri
.erstr2it
.erstri4t1t
.er8stritt6en.
.erstrit1te
.erstrit3ten
.er4zen4
.e2r1z
.2e1s1p2
.es3ta
.es1t
.es5t4e
.e4st2h
.es3to
.e1s5t2r4
.e2t2s
.e1t
.eu1
.e2u3g4
.2e2u3t
.4eve4r1
.2e1v
.e1ve2
.e4x1t4
.fe2i
.1fe
.fer4no
.fe4rn
.fi3es1t
.1fi
.fi4le.
.fi1le
.fi4len
.3fi2s
.1f4l2u1g1
.f2l2
.fo4r2t
.1fo
.4f1s4
.fu2sc
.1fu
.f2us
.g2a4t
.2gd2
.ge5n1ar
.1ge
.3gen
.ge3n1a
.ge3ne
.ge3r2a
.ge3r2e
.ge3u
.4g2s4
.gu6s1s1
.1gu
.g2us
.ha2u2t1
.ha2u
.he2
.h2e3fe
.he1f
.her3an
.her1a
.h2e3ri
.he6r5i4n1n
.hi2s
.ho4me1t
.ho1m2e
.h2om
.i1a4
.i1m2a
.ima4ge
.ima1g
.i2m5m
.in1
.2i1n3e
.i2n1k4
.in1n2e
.i4n1n
.in1u1
.i1r2e3
.i1s2a
.jor3
.ka2b5l2
.1ka
.ka1b
.ka2i
.ka2m1p2
.ka4t3i1o
.k2a1t
.k4a3ti
.ki4e
.kle2i
.kl2
.k2le
.kn4i4e
.k2n2
.k1ni
.kopf1
.1ko
.2ks2
.k2us2
.le4ar
.1le
.l2e1a
.l2i2f
.1li
.li4tu
.li4ve.
.l2i1v
.li1ve2
.lo4g3in
.1lo
.l2o1g
.lo3ver1
.2l1o1v
.lo2ve2
.lus4t2r4
.lu4s1t
.l2us
.ma3d
.1ma
.ma2i
.ma3la
.ma2s1t
.3mas
.2m1d2
.m4e2e
.1me
.me1l2a
.men8s4c2hl2
.m2e6n1s
.men1sc
.mensc4h
.men8s4c2hw
.me4n3t4
.3mi4t1
.1mi
.2m1m2
.nä2s1c
.1nä
.3näs
.3n2e4s
.1ne
.n4i4e
.1ni
.no1b4
.1no
.n4o4t3h
.n2o1t
.3n2u2s2
.2o3a3
.ob1a
.o1b
.ob2e2
.oper4
.op2e
.or2a
.o4r1t2
.ort1s3e
.or4ts
.os5t6a2l1g
.os1t
.os2ta
.os1t2e2
.ost5e2n1d
.o4s3ten
.os8ten8de
.oste6r3e
.o2ster
.os2t3r4
.ozo4
.2o1z
.ö1d2
.p2a4r1e
.p2a
.par3t4h
.pa4r1t
.pf4
.1ph4
.po1ka2
.1p2o
.3p2o1k
.1p4ro1
.p2r2
.2p1s2
.r2a2m3s
.re4b3s2
.1re
.re1b
.re3cha
.r2ec4h
.rei2n4t
.r1ein
.r2e1li1
.re3l2i3e
.re1s6t2r4
.3res1t
.r2i2a1s
.1ri
.ri1a
.rich1t6e
.r2ic
.ric4h
.ri2c4h1t
.r2o4a2
.ro3m2a
.r2om
.rö2s1
.2r1ü1b
.1rü
.rü6ck1er6
.r2üc
.rüc4k
.rü1cke
.sal2i3e
.1sa
.s2a1li
.sc4h4
.1sc
.2s1e3c4k
.1se
.3s2e6n3s
.s2e1r2u2
.3se2t1
.sh2a2
.2s1h
.sich
.si2m3p4
.1si
.si4te
.3s2it
.ski1e
.2s1k2
.spieg2e8lei
.1sp2
.3s2pi4e
.spie1g
.spie3ge
.spieg2el
.spiege3le
.s1t4
.2s3t4o4re
.s2to
.sucher6
.1su
.3s2u1c
.su1che
.suc4h
.t2ag2e4s2
.1ta
.3t2a1g
.ta1ge
.3t4a1l2e
.t3an4k3l2
.t2a2n1k
.ta2to
.t2a1t
.t4e2e
.1te
.te2f
.te3no
.3ten
.3te2s
.t2e4s1t
.t1h4
.ti2a
.1ti
.ti1d1
.ti4me.
.ti1me
.ti4mes
.3ti2s
.ti5ta
.3ti3t2e4
.to4nin1
.1to
.3ton
.t4o3ni
.to4p2l4
.3t2o2w
.tri3es
.1t2r4
.3t1ri
.1tu2e
.tr2ie
.tro2s
.2ts2
.tu3ri
.1tu
.u1f2e2
.ufer1
.ul4mei
.u1l
.u2l1m
.ul1me
.um3
.u1mo2
.u1n3a2
.und
.un1
.u2n3d
.u3n3e
.u4n3g
.u3n2i4t
.u1ni
.u6n3s2
.uns4t
.ur1
.u1r2i
.u2r3i6n4s
.ur3o2m
.4u1ro
.uro2p
.u4r3s2
.u1t2a
.2u1t
.u1t3r4
.übe4
.1üb
.ve5n2e
.1ve2
.vo4r1
.wa2h4l
.w2a
.1wah
.1wa2s
.wei4ta
.we2i
.we2it
.wi4e
.wor2
.wor3t5e2n6
.wo4r1t
.wor1te
.wor8te2n1d
.wor4tu
.1xe3
.ya4l
.z1a2s
.zi2e
.zin4s1t
.zi6n1s
.zwe2
.zw2
2aa
a1a1b
aa2be
aa1c
aa2g2r4
aa1g
4a1a2n
4a2ar
aa2r1a
a2a2r3f4
aa4r1t2
aas5t
aa2t4s3
a2a1t
a3a2u
a1ä
a1b
2aba
ab1auf
aba2u
ab1ä
ab2äu
1a2b3d4
a3b1e1b
ab4e1e
abei1
ab1e4il2
2a3bel
abe2la
a3ber
ab1e2r1k
ab1e2r1r
ab1e2r1z
ab3es3s4e
a3be1s
abe6s1s
2a3be1t
2a3b2e1w
1a2b5f4
3ab1fi
1a2b1g2
1a2b5h2
2a1bi
ab1i6n1s
ab1ir
ab1it
1a2b1k4
ab1l2
1a2bla
ab5la1g
1a2blä
2ab2le
ab4le.
ab3li
ab4lo
3a2b1lö
a2blu
1a4b3n2
a2bo.
a2b2of
1a2bon
2abor
ab3r4
a3bra
a4brä
2a3b1rü
1a4b1s
2abs.
ab1s2a
2ab2s3ar
ab3s2i
ab3sp2
abs2t4
2ab6st.
ab3s1t2e
ab3s1z
1abtei
a4b3t
ab5te
2abu
ab1ur
2abü
1a2b1w
2a3by1
aby4t2
1a2b3z2
2a1ca
2a2c1c
a1ce1m
2a4ch.
ac4h
ach1a
a1chal
ach3a2u
2a2c2h3b2
a1che
a2ch1e2c
a4ch1ei
a4che2r1f
a4che2r1k
a4ch1er1ö
a4ch3e2r1w
4a2c2h3f4
a1chi
a2c2h3l2
a4c2h3m
a2c2h3n4
a1cho
a3cho.
a2ch1o2b
ach1or
ac1h3ö
ac2h3r4
ach3s1u
a4c4hs
a4c4h1t
ach3t5e4r3g2
ach1te
ach2t1o2
ach8t3r4aum
ach1t2r4
achtra2u
ach8träume.
achträ2u
achtr2äum
achträu1me
ach8träum2en.
achträum2en
ach6tr2it
ach3t4ri
a1chu
a2ch1u2f
a4ch3ü
2a2c2h1v
4a4c2h1w
a1ci
ac1in
a1cka4r1
ac4k
ac1k1a
ack2en
a1cke
a2ck1in
a1cki
ack2se
a4c2ks
ack3s1l2
ack3s2ta4
acks1t4
a1c4l2
aco4n4n
a3co
2a3cu
a1ç
a1d
2a3da.
a3d2a1b
ad2a1g
ada2m
ad3a1m2a
a2d1an
3a4d1a1p
a3d2ar3
4ad2a1v
1a2dä
a2d1c
1a2d1d2
2ade.
a1de
ade2al
ad2e1a
ad2e1fi4
ade1f
a2dein
ad1ei
2aden
ade1r2a
a2d2e1ri
4ade1s1
ad2e3s2p2
ade6s4s2
ade5s2t2r4
ades1t
2a2d1f4
2a2d1h2
4a3di
ad2i3en
adi2e
5a2d1j
2ado
ad2o1b
2a2d3p2
2a2d1q
2ad3rec
ad2r4
ad1re
ad4res
ad3ru
2a2d1s2
ad3s1t4
ad3s1z
a2d2t1
ad4te
ad4t3r4
2a1du
2a1e
ae2b
ae2c
ae2d
a2e1k
a2e1la
a2e1le
a2e2o3
ae2p
3a2e1r2o1
aes5t
a2e1t
a2e1w
ae2x
a1f1a
a2fak
a2fan
a3f2ar
af4a1t
a2fa2u
2a1fe
a2f1e2c
a2f1e4n1t
af1e4r1l
a2f1ex
af2f3l2
a2f1f
af4flu
2a1fi
2af3l2
afo1s
a1fo
a2fö
af3ra
af2r2
af3rä
af3re
af3rö
af3s2a
a4f1s
af2sp2
af2t1a
a4f1t
af2tei
af1te
af4t3e4r1l
af2t3r4
af4t5re
af2tur
af1tu
a2f3ur
a1fu
a1g
2aga
ag1a1b
ag1a2d
ag1ar
ag1a2u
ag2di
a2gd
ag2d3r4
ag2d1u
age1i
a1ge
age4n1a
a3gen
age4n1e1b
age1ne
a2ge4n1t
a4gen3tu
ag2er
age4r2al
age1r1a
2ag2e1s2
age2sa
age4s2el
age1se
age4si
ag2e2s3p2
ag3es3se
age6s1s
age4s3ti
ages1t2
ag3g3l
a4g1g
1agg4r4
3a2git
2a2gl
ag4la
a4g1lö
ag2n
ag4ne.
ag1n2e
a2g4nu
a2g3re
ag2r4
a2g3ri
ag4ro
ag1sa2
a4g2s1
ag4sam
ag4se4t
ag1se2
ag1s3p4
ag4s1p2o
ag3s3ta
ags1t
ag3s1t2e
ags4t2o1c
ag3s2to
2a2g1t
ag2t1h
a2gu2n1d
a1gu
agun1
2ah.
2a1ha
ah4a1t
2a1he
a2h1er3h4
ahe1s
a1h2i
ahi2n3
ahl3a2
a2hl
ah4l1ei
ah1le
ah4l3er3h4
ah3ler
ah2l2ö
ahl3s1z
ah4l1s
ah4n1a
a2hn
ahne1r4e2
ah1n2e
ah2n1t2
1ahor
ah1os
a2h3ö
ahr1a
a2hr
ah3r2e
ah3re4s3
ah3ri
ahr1ta4
ah4r1t
ahr6t3ri
ahr1t2r4
2a4hs
ah4t3s
a4h1t
a1hu
a2h1w
a1hy
a2ian3
ai1a
ai2d2s
ai1d
ai1e2
a2i1en3
a2if2
a2i3g4
a3ik.
a2i1k
a4i3ke
ai3ku
a2il
a2i2lo
a1i2n1d
a2i1n4e
a1i4n1g
ain3sp4
ai6n1s
2ais
ai2sa
a3i6s4ch.
ai1sc
aisc4h
a2i3s2e
ai1so2
a3iv.
a2i1v
ai1ve3
a3i2v1l2
a3i2vs
a1j
aje2
ajek1t4o
aje1k
aj2e4k1t
2ak.
1a2k4a1d
a1ka
2akal
2a3kam
2akar
ak4a1t
1a2k2a1z
2a2k3b4
2a2k3c
2a2k3d2
4a1ke
a2ke1f
ake4n2n
a2keu
2a1ki
2ak3l2
ak4li
4a1ko
2a1k2r4
4akra
ak3ra2u
3akro
2a2ks
ak3s1h
2ak1ta
a4k1t
ak5t1an
2ak4t3b2
2ak3t2i1k
ak1ti
ak2t3r4
ak5t4ri
2akt1s1t4
ak2t3s4
2a1ku
a2kun1
4a3kü
1a2k3z2
a1la
2a3la.
al1a1b
ala5c4h2
a2l1af
ala2g
al1a1ge
a3l1al
al1am
al3a1m4e
al2a1mi5
al3a2m1p
al1a1na
a2l1a4n1g
a2l1a6n1s
al1a2n1z
a2lar
a3l2ar.
a3l2a1re
al2a4r1m
al3a2r1r
ala4s
a2l1a1si
al1a6s1s
2al2a1t
al1a2u
a1l3a2u1g
a1lä
al1äm
alb3ein
a2l1b
alb3eis
al4ber3h4
al4b3e2r1w
al2b1l2
al2b3li
al2boh
al2b2r4
alb3ru
al4b3s
al2dä
a4l1d
al2d3r4
ald3s2t4
al2d1s
al3du
2a1le
3a2l1e2b
3a2l1e1f
a4l1eh
a2l1ei
a4l3ein
a2l1el
alen1
al3en2d1s
ale2n1d
a2le4n1g
a2le2p
al1e1p2o
a2l1e2r1f
a2l1er3h4
al1e4r1l
3ale4r1m
a2l1e4r3t
3a2l1e2r1z
a2l1e3s1k2
ale4t
al1e1ta
a2l1e3t2h
a2l1e2u
a4leur
3a2lex
alf4r2
a2l1f
3algi
a2l1g
al2g1li
2a1li
ali4e1ne
al2ie
al2i1en
ali4n3al
ali3n2a
al1i6n1s
a2l1i2n1v2
alk1ar
a2l1k
al1ka
1alkoh
al1ko
al2k3s2
alks4t4
al2la1b
a4l1l
al2l3a4r
al2l1a2u
al3le2n1d
al1le
all5er1fa
alle2r1f
al3l2es
1allgä
al2l1g4
alli5er.
al1li
all2ie
alli7ers.
allie4r1s
al2l1o1b
al1lo
3al2m1b2
a2l1m
2a1lo
a2l1o2b
alo2ga
al2o1g
al1op2e
a2l1o2r1c
a2l1ö
al2ös
3al1pe.
a2l1p
alp2e
1al1ph
al3sk4l2
a4l1s
al2s1k2
al5s6te2r1b
al2s1t2e
als1t
al2ster
al3su2n1
al1su
al2t1ak
a4l1t
al1ta
al3t1a2m
alt3e2i1g
al1te
al4t3e2r1f
al2t3re
al1t2r4
al3t1ri
al4t3r2ic
al2tro
alt2se
al6ts
alt4s2tü
alt1s1t4
a1lu
a1l2uf
a2lum
al1u2m1b2
a2l1ur
4a1ly
al2z1e2r4z
a2l1z
al2z1w2
2am.
2a1m2a
am1a1b4
ama1d2
ama3g
2a3mä
2a1m4e
4ame.
a2me1b4
ame2n1
ame1r2a
a2m2e1ri
am2e3ru
a4m4e3s1h
a3mes
a3me1t
a2me1w
2a2m1f4
a3mi.
a1mi
a3mie
2a3mir
a3mis
ami3ta
a3mit
ami3ti
2a4m1k4
2a4m1l2
2am2m1al
a2m1m
am1ma
am2m1ei
am1me
am2min
am1mi
2am4m1l2
am1mu2
a2mö
amp2fa2
a2m1p
am2pf
am3p2r2
2a2m2s
am3sa
am4s4c2hl2
am3sc
amsc4h2
am3s4t2r4
ams1t
1amt.
a4m1t
am2t1a
am2t1ä
am4tel
am1te
2amte1m
am4t3e4rn
am4tö
am2t3r4
am4t1re
am2tu
2a1mu
2a3na.
a1na
2a2n1a1b
a3n2a3c
an4a3di3
ana1d
a3n1ak
an1a2l1g
ana4lin
an2a1li
2anam
2anan
2a3na1s4
a3n1äs
a1nä
1a2n3b4
2anbu
an3c4h
a2n1c
2and.
a2n1d
an3d1ac
and4a4r1t
ande4l4s
an1de
ande2s1
an2dex
an2d3rü
and2r4
and4sas
an2d1s
and1sa
and6s1pas
and1sp2
andsp2a
and3s1t2e
ands1t4
and2su
2an1du
and1ur2
2a1ne
a2n3e2c
a3n4ee3
an2ei.
a2n1ei
a4n3e2if
an1e4k
3a4n1e2r1b
an1e2t2h
ane1t
1a2n1f
2an3fi
anf2t5s3
an4f1t
an3f2u
4ang.
a4n1g
3ange1b
an1ge
an2g1ei
an4g3e2r1f
an3ger
an4g3e4r1l
an4ge2r1w
an4g3e2r1z
2an2g1f4
2an2g1h
2angie
ang1l
an2gla
2ango
ang2r4
an2g3ra
4angs.
an4g2s1
ang4s3p2o
ang1sp4
1a2n1h4
2a3ni
an2i3d
ani5ers.
an4ie
anie4r1s
3a4nim
a4n1i6n1s
anin1
2an1j
2ank.
a2n1k
an2k1an
an1ka
an2kei
an3kl2
an4k1lö
an2k3no
ank2n2
ank2r4
an2k3ra
an2k3rä
an4k1t4
1a2n3l2
2an1mu
a2n1m4
2a4n1n
3an3na
an2n2a1b
3an1nä
an3n2e
a2n1o2d
a1no
a3n2ol
a2n1or
a3nos
a1nö
2anp2r2
a2n3p4
1a2n3r2
1an1sä
a6n1s
1an1sc
ans2en
an1se
an2seu
2an2s1k2
an3sk2r4
ans1p2a
an1sp4
1ansp2r2
an3s2z
2ant.
a2n1t
an2t3a4r
an1ta
1antá
1antei
an1te
3ante4n3n
an3t2en
an3t4h2e
ant1h
1an3t2h2r2
2an3to
1an1t2r4
ant3rin
an3t1ri
an2tro
1an4t3w
2a1nu
a3n2u3s
a1nü
1a4n1w
2an1we1t
2an4z3b4
a2n1z
1anzei
2an2z1g2
an2z1i4n
2an4z3s2
1anzü
2anzw2
an2zwi
2ao
a2o1i
a1op
a1or
a1os3
a2o3t2
a3ot.
a1ö
a1p
2ap.
2ap2a
2ap2e
a2pe1f4
a2pé
a2pf
ap2fa
a3pf2l2
a3phä
a1ph
a2p4h3t2
2a1p3l4
a2p2n
a2p2o1t
a1p2o
3ap1p3l4
a2p1p
ap3pu
2ap2r2
2a3pu
2aq
2ar.
a1ra
a3ra.
ar2a1b
a2r3a4b3t
ar2a3d2
a2r3al
a3r4a3li
a2r1a4n1g
a2r1a6n1s
a2r1a2n1z
a2r3a2p1p
ar2a1p
2a2r1ar
a2r1a2u
a1rä
1a2r1b
2arb.
4arba
ar2ba2u
ar2be1c
2arben
2ar1bi
ar2bl2
2arb2r4
ar2b1re
2ar4b2s2
2ar4b3t
2arb2u
ar2b3un1
1a2r1c
ar2dro
a2r1d
ard2r4
2a1re
a2r2e1a
a4r1e2f1f
are1f
a4re1g
a2reh
ar1e2hr
a2r1ein
a4re1k
a3ren
ar1en4se
are6n1s
are3r2a
ar2e2r1f
a2r1er3h4
a2r2e1ri
a2r1e4r1l
are3u
ar2e1w
2a2r1f
arf2r2
ar2f3ra
ar2gl
a4r1g
ar2g1n
2ar1h4
2a1ri
ar2i1a
ar2i3e4n
ar2ie
ari3e2r1d
ari3e4r1g
ar1im
a2ri2n3it
ari1ni
a2r1i2n1t
a3r2i3u2
ar2kal
a2r1k
ar1ka
ark3a4m1t
ark2am
ar2k1ar
ark3a2u1e
arka2u
ark3la1g
arkl2
ar2kor
ar1ko
ar4k1ri
ark2r4
ar2k1s4
ark3sa
ark3s1h
ark4t1re
ark2t3r4
ar4k1t
ar2les
a4r1l
ar1l2e
ar3m2ä
a4r1m
ar4me2r1k
ar1me
ar3m2or
ar1mo
ar2na4n
a4rn
ar1na
ar3n2e
2a1ro
ar1o1b
a2r1o2d
a2r1op
a2r1or
2a2r1r
ar2r3a1d
arre4n3
ar3r2e
ar2r1h4
arr3he
2ar1sa
a4r1s
ar4s4c2h2l2
ar1sc
arsc4h
ar1se3
ar3s2h
2ar3si
ar2s1t
ar3s2ta
ar3t2e
a4r1t
ar2th2e
art1h
ar3t2i
artin2
2ar1to
ar4t3ram
ar1t2r4
art3re
2ar4ts
2a1ru
ar1u1h
a2r1um
a2rü
2a2r1v
arw2a2
a2r1w
2a1ry
ar2zä2
a2r1z
2arze
1ar2z1t
ar2z1w2
as1a1la
a1sa
as3a4u
a2s1ä
a2s1ca
a1sc
a3sche
asc4h
a4schec
a3schi
asch3la
as4c2hl2
a2s4c2h2m
a3s4chu
4a1s2e
a2se1b
a2s3e2m
a3ses
4a2s1h
a3s2hi
asi4n2g
a1si
2a3s2is
a4s3ka3s
a2s1k2
as1ka
a3skop
as1ko
a2s1o2f
a1so
as1or
a2sö
a2s1p2
as2ph
as2pi
as2p2o
a3s1pu
as3s2a
a6s1s
as3s2e
as4s3ei
as3s2i
as2s1p2
as2s1t
ass3ti
as3s2t2r4
as3s1t2u
2as3ta
as1t
a1s4tas
as4ta2u
as3t2e
a4s2t1h
as3ti
as3to
a1s4tof
2as2t2r4
ast3rä
as6t3re
a2sü
as1wa2s
a2s1w
as3w2a
3a2sy1l1
a1s4y
a1ß
a1ße2
aßen3
2a1t
a1ta1
at1a1b
at2af
a3t4a1g
a2t1a4k1t
ata3l
a3tam
a2t1a2pf
ata1p
at1a2u
a2ta2us
a2t1ä
a4t2c
a1t2e
4a3te.
a2te1b
at3e2i1g
a2t2e1li
4a3ten
a2te1p
ate4r3s2
at2e2ru2
4a3tes
at2h
a2t3h4a
4ath2e1
3a4t2h3l
4a3ti
ati4l4s
ati2s3t
a3tis
3a4t3m2
4atm4us
at1mu
ato4man
a1to
